Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.050

Governor's general powers and duties.

(1) The governor, through the director, shall have general supervision and control of the emergency management functions in the department, and shall be responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, and in the event of disaster beyond local control, may assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency management functions within this state.

(2) In performing his or her duties under this chapter, the governor is authorized to cooperate with the federal government, with other states, and with private agencies in all matters pertaining to the emergency management of this state and of the nation.

(3) In performing his or her duties under this chapter and to effect its policy and purpose, the governor is further authorized and empowered:

(a) To make, amend, and rescind the necessary orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter within the limits of the authority conferred upon him [or her] herein, with due consideration of the plans of the federal government;

(b) On behalf of this state, to enter into mutual aid arrangements with other states and territories, or provinces of the Dominion of Canada and to coordinate mutual aid interlocal agreements between political subdivisions of this state;

(c) To delegate any administrative authority vested in him [or her] under this chapter, and to provide for the subdelegation of any such authority;

(d) To appoint, with the advice of local authorities, metropolitan or regional area coordinators, or both, when practicable;

(e) To cooperate with the president and the heads of the armed forces, the emergency management agency of the United States, and other appropriate federal officers and agencies, and with the officers and agencies of other states in matters pertaining to the emergency management of the state and nation.

[ 1997 c 49 s 3; 1986 c 266 s 27; 1984 c 38 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 7; 1951 c 178 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.